Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1737.01
Developer; time-share interval; duties; violation.

Notwithstanding any obligations placed upon other persons pursuant to the Nebraska Time-Share Act, the developer shall supervise, manage, and control all aspects of the offering of a time-share interval, including, but not limited to, promotion, advertising, contracting, and closing. Any violation of this section which occurs during such offering shall be a violation by the developer as well as by the person actually committing such violation.

Laws 2001, LB 68, § 19.